Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1337
Cooperative farm land company; certificate of compliance; occupation tax laws inapplicable.

Upon the filing of the report and the payment of the fee provided for in section 21-1336, the Secretary of State shall make out and deliver to such corporation a certificate witnessing the compliance by such corporation with section 21-1336 and the payment of the annual fee therein provided for. No further compliance with sections 21-301 to 21-325 shall be required of such cooperative farm land companies.

Laws 1941, c. 38, § 5, p. 155;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 24-2105;

R.S.1943, § 21-1337;

Laws 1988, LB 800, § 6.